Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.835

Code city retaining former second-class city plan—Oath and bond of officers.

Before entering upon official duties and within ten days after receiving notice of being elected or appointed to city office, every officer of a city initially classified as a second-class city prior to January 1, 1993, that retained its second-class city plan of government when the city reorganized as a noncharter code city shall qualify by taking the oath of office and by filing such bond duly approved as may be required. The oath of office shall be filed with the county auditor. If no notice of election or appointment was received, the officer must qualify on or before the date fixed for the assumption of the duties of the office. The city council shall fix the amount of all official bonds and may designate what officers shall be required to give bonds in addition to those required to do so by statute.

All official bonds shall be approved by the city council and when so approved shall be filed with the city clerk except the city clerk's which shall be filed with the mayor. No city officer shall be eligible as a surety upon any bond running to the city as obligee.

The city council may require a new or additional bond of any officer whenever it deems it expedient.

[ 1994 c 81 s 31; 1987 c 3 s 8; 1986 c 167 s 17; 1965 c 7 s 35.23.190. Prior: (i) 1907 c 241 s 10, part; 1890 p 145 s 29; RRS s 9015, part. (ii) 1907 c 241 s 11; 1890 p 145 s 29; RRS s 9016. Formerly RCW 35.23.190.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.

Severability—1986 c 167: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.